Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2235
Care management unit; reimbursement by department.

(1) Each care management unit may be reimbursed by the Department of Health and Human Services for costs or through other reimbursement specified in section 81-2234. Reimbursement by the department shall be based on actual casework time units expended on all care management services provided and shall include expenses for personnel, administration and planning, client eligibility review, contractual services, and necessary support services and other necessary actual and indirect costs. Standardized rates of reimbursement shall be adopted and promulgated by the department and shall be adjusted at least every three years.

(2) Appropriations for reimbursement by the department for services provided under sections 81-2229 to 81-2235 and for the costs of the department to administer the program shall be appropriated separately from funds appropriated under the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act.

Laws 1987, LB 42, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 881;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 33;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 31.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Community Aging Services Act, see section 81-2201.